Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.270

Intradistrict enrollment options policies.

(1) Each school district in the state shall adopt and implement a policy allowing intradistrict enrollment options no later than June 30, 1990. Each district shall establish its own policy establishing standards on how the intradistrict enrollment options will be implemented.

(2) A district shall permit the children of full-time certificated and classified school employees to enroll at:

(a) The school to which the employee is assigned;

(b) A school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which includes the school to which the employee is assigned; or

(c) A school in the district that provides early intervention services pursuant to RCW 43.216.580 or preschool services pursuant to RCW 28A.155.070, if the student is eligible for such services.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "full-time employees" means employees who are employed for the full number of hours and days for their job description.

[ 2020 c 90 s 7; 2008 c 192 s 2; 2003 c 36 s 2; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 90: See note following RCW 43.216.580.

Captions, headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.225.225.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.